District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.12

Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child-support order issued by a tribunal of the District is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of the District:

(1)

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

(2)

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

(3)

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 612, 63 DCR 222

History